Utah statutes.
31A-41-201.   Creation of Title Insurance Recovery, Education, and Research Fund.

(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund to be known as the "Title Insurance Recovery, Education, and Research Fund."

(2)  The fund shall consist of:

(a)  assessments on title insurance producers made under this chapter;

(b)  amounts collected under Section 31A-41-305; and

(c)  interest earned on the fund.

(3)  Interest on fund money shall be deposited into the fund.

(4)  The department shall administer the fund.

